Vermont, session 2025-2026, S251.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. § 4085 is added to read:
§ 4085. DIAGNOSIS AND TREATMENT OF CERTAIN PEDIATRIC
NEUROPSYCHIATRIC CONDITIONS
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “PANDAS” means Pediatric Autoimmune Neuropsychiatric
Disorders Associated with Streptococcal Infections (PANDAS).
VT LEG #385003 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.251
2026 Page 2 of 3
(2) “PANS” means Pediatric Acute-onset Neuropsychiatric Syndrome
(PANS).
(b)(1) A health insurance plan shall provide coverage for the medically
necessary diagnosis and treatment of PANDAS and PANS that is prescribed or
ordered by the covered individual’s treating health care professional. Covered
treatments shall include antibiotics, medication therapy and mental health
services to manage neuropsychiatric symptoms, immunomodulating
medicines, plasma exchange, and intravenous immunoglobulin therapy.
(2) Coverage for PANDAS and PANS shall adhere to the treatment
recommendations set forth in current clinical practice guidelines published in
peer-reviewed medical literature or endorsed by organizations composed of
expert treating health care professionals.
(c) A health insurance plan shall not impose greater coinsurance, co-
payment, deductible, or other cost-sharing requirements for coverage of the
diagnosis or treatment of PANDAS or PANS than apply to the diagnosis and
treatment of any other physical or mental condition under the plan.
(d) For billing and diagnosis purposes, PANDAS and PANS may be coded
as autoimmune encephalitis until such time as the American Medical
Association and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services create and
assign a specific code for PANDAS and PANS. After a specific code has been
established, PANDAS and PANS may be coded as autoimmune encephalitis,
VT LEG #385003 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.251
2026 Page 3 of 3
PANDAS, or PANS. If PANDAS or PANS is known by a different common
name in the future, that name may be used for coding purposes and this section
shall apply to that disorder or syndrome.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027, and shall apply to all health
insurance plans issued on and after January 1, 2027, on such date as a health
insurer offers, issues, or renews the health insurance plan, but in no event later
than January 1, 2028.
VT LEG #385003 v.1